District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0642.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Closing of Portions of a Public Alley in Square 571, S.O. 25-01939, Act
of 2026”.
Sec. 2(a) Pursuant to section 404 of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 787; D.C. Official Code § 1-204.04), and consistent with the Street
and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law
4-201; D.C. Official Code § 9-201.01 et seq.), the Council finds that the portions of the public
alley system in Square 571, as shown on the Surveyor’s plat filed under S.O. 25-01939, are
unnecessary for alley purposes and orders them closed, with title to the land to vest as shown on
the Surveyor’s plat.
(b) The ordering of the alley closure in subsection (a) of this section is contingent upon
the satisfaction of all the conditions set forth in the official file for S.O. 25-01939.
Sec. 3. Transmittal.
The Council shall transmit a copy of this act, upon its effective date, to the Surveyor of
the District of Columbia and the District of Columbia Recorder of Deeds.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.


The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.